Montana, session 2025, HB773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 3] may be cited as "Noah's Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Purpose. The purpose of [sections 1 through 3] is to streamline
transportation planning processes by reducing redundant reviews while maintaining compliance with federal
and state standards for safety and efficiency.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 773

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 773.1

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Metropolitan planning organizations -- transportation plans. (1)
Long-range transportation plans adopted by metropolitan planning organizations and approved by the
department and commission must be recognized by the department and commission as fulfilling state
transportation review requirements for projects that are implementing the approved long-range transportation
plan.
(2) When a transportation project aligns with a long-range transportation plan that was adopted by
a metropolitan planning organization and that was previously approved and reviewed by the commission,
further review of the transportation project by the commission may not be required provided that the long-range
transportation plan adopted by the metropolitan planning organization has been reviewed and approved by the
department.
(3) An urban street and department roadway project within a metropolitan planning organization
district may not require commission review if:
(a) the project implements a state-reviewed plan adopted by a metropolitan planning organization;
and
(b) the project is approved by the relevant department district administrator.
(4) Nonoperational safety improvements on urban streets and department roadways included in
city, county, or metropolitan planning organization plans must be approved by the department district
administrator rather than the commission or other department personnel.
(5) In communities without a metropolitan planning organization, department district administrators
must have the authority to review and approve projects below a specified scale, as determined by the
department in rule, without obtaining approval from the commission.
(6) As used in this section, "metropolitan planning organization" means a cooperative
transportation policymaking organization that is composed of representatives from local government and
transportation professionals, that is required by Title 23 of the United States Code for an area with a population
greater than 50,000, and that carries out transportation planning and programming.

Section 4. Section 60-2-110, MCA, is amended to read:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 773

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 773.1
"60-2-110. Setting priorities and selecting projects. (1) Except as provided in 60-2-133 and
[section 3], the commission shall establish priorities and select and designate segments for construction and
reconstruction on the national highway system, the primary highway system, the secondary highway system,
the urban highway system, and state highways.
(2) The Except as provided in [section 3], the commission shall consult with the board of county
commissioners of the county in which a highway is located when establishing priorities and when selecting and
designating segments on the secondary highway system for construction and reconstruction.
(3) The Except as provided in [section 3], the commission shall consult with the appropriate local
government authorities when establishing priorities and selecting and designating segments on the urban
highway system for construction and reconstruction.
(4) The commission shall use information gathered or discovered by and documents prepared by
the department, and department officials and employees shall provide assistance and advice.
(5) The commission shall establish and determine priorities and projects for rail and transit
programs and, to the extent possible, coordinate intermodal transportation within the state.
(6) In carrying out the requirements of this section, the department shall:
(a) make recommendations to the commission;
(b) establish the requirements and procedures for administering this section; and
(c) take all reasonable steps to ensure the integrity and viability of agricultural and rural
transportation and related needs."

Section 5. Section 60-2-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"60-2-111. Letting of contracts on state highways and commission-designated highway
systems. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) and subject to the provisions of [section 3], all contracts for
the construction or reconstruction of the highways located on commission-designated highway systems and
state highways, including portions in cities and towns, and all contracts entered into under 7-14-4108 must be
let by the commission. Except as otherwise specifically provided, the commission may enter the types of
contracts and upon terms that it may decide. All contracts must meet the requirements of Title 18, chapter 2,
part 4. When there is no prevailing rate of wages set by collective bargaining, the commission shall determine
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 773

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 773.1
the prevailing rate to be stated in the contract.
(2) The commission may delegate the authority, with all applicable statutory restrictions, to award
any contract covered by this section to the department or to a unit of local government.
(3) The commission may award contracts for projects that the department has determined are part
of the design-build contracting program authorized in 60-2-137.
(4) The commission may award contracts using alternative project delivery methods in accordance
with 60-2-120."

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 3] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 60, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 60, chapter 2, part 1, apply
to [sections 1 through 3].
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 773